Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.840

County auditor duties—Dismissal of challenges—Notification—Hearings—Counting or cancellation of ballots.

(1) If the challenge is not in proper form or the factual basis for the challenge does not meet the legal grounds for a challenge, the county auditor may dismiss the challenge and notify the challenger of the reasons for the dismissal. A challenge is not in proper form if it is incomplete on its face or does not substantially comply with the form issued by the secretary of state.

(2) If the challenge is in proper form and the factual basis meets the legal grounds for a challenge, the county auditor must notify the challenged voter and provide a copy of the affidavit. The county auditor shall also provide to any person, upon request, a copy of all materials provided to the challenged voter.

(a) If the challenge is to the residential address provided by the voter, the challenged voter must be provided notice of the exceptions allowed in RCW 29A.08.112 and 29A.04.151, and Article VI, section 4 of the state Constitution, and may update the residence address on the voter's voter registration, or reregister until 8:00 p.m. the day of the election.

(b) The county auditor must schedule a hearing and notify the challenger and the challenged voter of the time and place for the hearing.

(3) All notice must be by certified mail to the address provided in the voter registration record, and any other addresses at which the challenged voter is alleged to reside or the county auditor reasonably expects the voter to receive notice. The challenger and challenged voter may either appear in person or submit testimony by affidavit. Personal appearance may be accomplished using video telecommunications technology if the auditor or canvassing board chooses.

(4) The challenger has the burden to prove by clear and convincing evidence that the challenged voter's registration is improper. The challenged voter must be provided a reasonable opportunity to respond. If the challenge is to the residential address provided by the voter, the challenged voter may provide evidence that he or she resides at the location described in his or her voter's registration records, or meets one of the exceptions allowed in RCW 29A.08.112 or 29A.04.151, or Article VI, section 4 of the state Constitution. If either the challenger or challenged voter fails to appear at the hearing, the challenge must be resolved based on the available facts.

(5) If the challenge is based on an allegation under RCW 29A.08.810(1) (a), (b), (d), or (e) and the canvassing board sustains the challenge, the voter registration shall be canceled and any challenged ballot shall not be counted. If the challenge is based on an allegation under RCW 29A.08.810(1)(c) and the canvassing board sustains the challenge, the board shall permit the voter to correct the residence address on the voter registration and any races and ballot measures on any challenged ballot that the voter would have been qualified to vote for had the registration been correct shall be counted.

(6) If the challenger fails to prove by clear and convincing evidence that the registration is improper, the challenge must be dismissed and any pending challenged ballot must be accepted as valid. All challenged ballots must be resolved before certification of the election. The decision of the county auditor or canvassing board is final subject only to judicial review by the superior court under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2023 c 466 s 31; 2006 c 320 s 6; 2003 c 111 s 256. Prior: 1987 c 288 s 4; 1983 1st ex.s. c 30 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 34; 1967 c 225 s 3; 1965 ex.s. c 156 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.10.140.]